Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-235.03
Public water suppliers; natural resources districts; powers.

Natural resources districts shall have the authority to impose restrictions or controls on public water suppliers as specified in the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act. Such restrictions or controls may limit the withdrawal of ground water to a greater degree or extent than is otherwise permitted or allowed by a permit issued by the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1993, LB 301, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 109;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 91.

Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, see section 46-701.